California statutes. Civil Code
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any sale of goods which is specifically prohibited by a federal or state statute or regulation or a local ordinance or regulation, or to relieve the seller of any responsibility for bringing the goods into compliance with any applicable federal or state statute or regulation or local ordinance or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.85.

Any retail seller who violates this chapter shall be liable to the buyer who returns the product for a refund, or credit on credit purchases, if the product purchased has not been used in a manner inconsistent with any printed instructions provided by the seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.86.

Any violation of this chapter constitutes unfair competition under Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code, grounds for rescission under Section 1689 of this code, and an unfair method of competition or deceptive practice under Section 1770 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Home Roof Warranties [1797.90. - 1797.96.]

1797.90.

This chapter shall apply to all contracts and warranties for roofing materials used on a residential structure, including, but not limited to, a manufactured home or mobilehome, and to all contracts and warranties for the installation, repair, or replacement of all or any portion of the roof of a residential structure, including, but not limited to, a manufactured home or mobilehome.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.91.

Any contract for roofing materials, or for the installation, repair, or replacement of all or any portion of the roof of a residential structure, including, but not limited to, a manufactured home or mobilehome, shall be in writing if the contract includes any warranty of the materials or workmanship that extends for any period of time beyond completion of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.92.

For any contract subject to this chapter that is entered into on or after January 1, 1994, the warranty obligations shall inure to the benefit of, and shall be directly enforceable by, all subsequent purchasers and transferees of the residential structure, without limitation, unless the contract contains a clear and conspicuous provision limiting transferability of the warranty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.93.

If any warranty subject to this chapter, uses the term “lifetime,” “life,” or a similar representation to describe the duration of the warranty, then the warranty shall disclose with such clarity and prominence as will be noticed and understood by prospective purchasers, the life to which the representation refers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.94.

Any warranty subject to this chapter, shall inure to the benefit of, and shall be directly enforceable by, all subsequent purchasers and transferees of the residential structure, without limitation, unless the warranty contains a provision limiting transferability of the warranty. A provision limiting transferability shall be set forth at the top of the first page of the warranty in 14-point boldface type, and shall be enclosed in a rectangular box in at least 4-point type.

(b) Any disclosure
required by Section 1797.93 shall also be set forth at the top of the first page of the warranty in 14-point boldface type, and shall be enclosed in a rectangular box in at least 4-point type. This disclosure may be included in a disclosure required under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.95.

A warrantor who provides roof warranties in multiple states may standardize the warranty to meet warranty requirements of other states. However, those standardized warranties shall meet requirements which are no less than those imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.96.

Where a warranty subject to this chapter is provided for the benefit of the purchaser of a newly constructed residential structure, the seller shall provide the warranty disclosures required by this chapter to the purchaser prior to the close of escrow. No transfer shall be invalidated for failure to comply with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.8. PERSONAL DATA [1798. - 1798.78.]



  CHAPTER 1. Information Practices Act of 1977 [1798. - 1798.78.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Legislative Findings [1798. - 1798.1.]

1798.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Information Practices Act of 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.1.

The Legislature declares that the right to privacy is a personal and fundamental right protected by Section 1 of Article I of the Constitution of California and by the United States Constitution and that all individuals have a right of privacy in information pertaining to them. The Legislature further makes the following findings:

(a) The right to privacy is being threatened by the indiscriminate collection, maintenance, and dissemination of personal information and the lack of effective laws and legal remedies.

(b) The increasing use of
 computers and other sophisticated information technology has greatly magnified the potential risk to individual privacy that can occur from the maintenance of personal information.

(c) In order to protect the privacy of individuals, it is necessary that the maintenance and dissemination of personal information be subject to strict limits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1798.3. - 1798.3.]

1798.3.

As used in this chapter:

(a) The term “personal information” means any information that is maintained by an agency that identifies or describes an individual, including, but not limited to, the individual’s name, social security number, physical description, home address, home telephone number, education, financial matters, and medical or employment history. It includes statements made by, or attributed to, the individual.

(b) The term “agency” means every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency, except that the term agency shall not include:

(1) The California Legislature.

(2) Any agency established under Article VI of the California Constitution.

(3) The State Compensation Insurance Fund, except as to any records that contain personal information about the employees of the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(4) A local agency, as defined in Section 7920.510 of the Government Code.

(c) The term “disclose” means to disclose, release, transfer, disseminate, or otherwise communicate all or any part of any record orally, in writing, or by electronic or any other means to any person or entity.

(d) The term “individual” means a natural person.

(e) The term “maintain” includes maintain, acquire, use, or
 disclose.

(f) The term “person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, or association.

(g) The term “record” means any file or grouping of information about an individual that is maintained by an agency by reference to an identifying particular such as the individual’s name, photograph, finger or voice print, or a number or symbol assigned to the individual.

(h) The term “system of records” means one or more records, which pertain to one or more individuals, which is maintained by any agency, from which information is retrieved by the name of an individual or by some identifying number, symbol, or other identifying particular assigned to the individual.

(i) The term “governmental entity,” except as used in
 Section 1798.26, means any branch of the federal government or of the local government.

(j) The term “commercial purpose” means any purpose that has financial gain as a major objective. It does not include the gathering or dissemination of newsworthy facts by a publisher or broadcaster.

(k) The term “regulatory agency” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Department of Insurance, the Bureau of Real Estate, and agencies of the United States or of any other state responsible for regulating financial institutions.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 43) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 25.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Agency Requirements [1798.14. - 1798.23.]

1798.14.

Each agency shall maintain in its records only personal information which is relevant and necessary to accomplish a purpose of the agency required or authorized by the California Constitution or statute or mandated by the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.15.

Each agency shall collect personal information to the greatest extent practicable directly from the individual who is the subject of the information rather than from another source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.16.

(a) Whenever an agency collects personal information, the agency shall maintain the source or sources of the information, unless the source is the data subject or he or she has received a copy of the source document, including, but not limited to, the name of any source who is an individual acting in his or her own private or individual capacity. If the source is an agency, governmental entity or other organization, such as a corporation or association, this requirement can be met by maintaining the name of the agency, governmental
 entity, or organization, as long as the smallest reasonably identifiable unit of that agency, governmental entity, or organization is named.

(b) On or after July 1, 2001, unless otherwise authorized by the Department of Information Technology pursuant to Executive Order D-3-99, whenever an agency electronically collects personal information, as defined by Section 11015.5 of the Government Code, the agency shall retain the source or sources or any intermediate form of the information, if either are created or possessed by the agency, unless the source is the data subject that has requested that the information be discarded or the data subject has received a copy of the source document.

(c) The agency shall maintain the source or sources of the information in a readily accessible form so as to be able to provide it to the data subject when they inspect any record pursuant to Section
 1798.34. This section shall not apply if the source or sources are exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.17.

Each agency shall provide on or with any form used to collect personal information from individuals the notice specified in this section. When contact with the individual is of a regularly recurring nature, an initial notice followed by a periodic notice of not more than one-year intervals shall satisfy this requirement. This requirement is also satisfied by notification to individuals of the availability of the notice in annual tax-related pamphlets or booklets provided for them. The notice shall include all of the following:

(a) The name of the agency and the division within the
 agency that is requesting the information.

(b) The title, business address, and telephone number of the agency official who is responsible for the system of records and who shall, upon request, inform an individual regarding the location of his or her records and the categories of any persons who use the information in those records.

(c) The authority, whether granted by statute, regulation, or executive order which authorizes the maintenance of the information.

(d) With respect to each item of information, whether submission of such information is mandatory or voluntary.

(e) The consequences, if any, of not providing all or any part of the requested information.

(f) The principal purpose
 or purposes within the agency for which the information is to be used.

(g) Any known or foreseeable disclosures which may be made of the information pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 1798.24.

(h) The individual’s right of access to records containing personal information which are maintained by the agency.

This section does not apply to any enforcement document issued by an employee of a law enforcement agency in the performance of his or her duties wherein the violator is provided an exact copy of the document, or to accident reports whereby the parties of interest may obtain a copy of the report pursuant to Section 20012 of the Vehicle Code.

The notice required by this section does not apply to agency requirements for an individual to provide his or her name, identifying number,
 photograph, address, or similar identifying information, if this information is used only for the purpose of identification and communication with the individual by the agency, except that requirements for an individual’s social security number shall conform with the provisions of the Federal Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-579).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.18.

Each agency shall maintain all records, to the maximum extent possible, with accuracy, relevance, timeliness, and completeness.

Such standard need not be met except when such records are used to make any determination about the individual. When an agency transfers a record outside of state government, it shall correct, update, withhold, or delete any portion of the record that it knows or has reason to believe is inaccurate or untimely.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.19.

Each agency when it provides by contract for the operation or maintenance of records containing personal information to accomplish an agency function, shall cause, consistent with its authority, the requirements of this chapter to be applied to those records. For purposes of Article 10 (commencing with Section 1798.55), any contractor and any employee of the contractor, if the contract is agreed to on or after July 1, 1978, shall be considered to be an employee of an agency. Local government functions mandated by the state are not deemed agency functions within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.20.

Each agency shall establish rules of conduct for persons involved in the design, development, operation, disclosure, or maintenance of records containing personal information and instruct each such person with respect to such rules and the requirements of this chapter, including any other rules and procedures adopted pursuant to this chapter and the remedies and penalties for noncompliance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.21.

Each agency shall establish appropriate and reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, to ensure the security and confidentiality of records, and to protect against anticipated threats or hazards to their security or integrity which could result in any injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.22.

Each agency shall designate an agency employee to be responsible for ensuring that the agency complies with all of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.23.

The Department of Justice shall review all personal information in its possession every five years commencing July 1, 1978, to determine whether it should continue to be exempt from access pursuant to Section 1798.40.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conditions of Disclosure [1798.24. - 1798.24b.]

1798.24.

An agency shall not disclose any personal information in a manner that would link the information disclosed to the individual to whom it pertains unless the information is disclosed, as follows:

(a) To the individual to whom the information pertains.

(b) With the prior written voluntary consent of the individual to whom the information pertains, but only if that consent has been obtained not more than 30 days before the disclosure, or in the time limit agreed to by the individual in the written consent.

(c) To the duly appointed guardian or conservator of the individual or a person
 representing the individual if it can be proven with reasonable certainty through the possession of agency forms, documents, or correspondence that this person is the authorized representative of the individual to whom the information pertains.

(d) To those officers, employees, attorneys, agents, or volunteers of the agency that have custody of the information if the disclosure is relevant and necessary in the ordinary course of the performance of their official duties and is related to the purpose for which the information was acquired.

(e) To a person, or to another agency if the transfer is necessary for the transferee agency to perform its constitutional or statutory duties, and the use is compatible with a purpose for which the information was collected and the use or transfer is in
 accordance with Section 1798.25. With respect to information transferred from a law enforcement or regulatory agency, or information transferred to another law enforcement or regulatory agency, a use is compatible if the use of the information requested is needed in an investigation of unlawful activity under the jurisdiction of the requesting agency or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes by that agency.

(f) To a governmental entity if required by state or federal law.

(g) Pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(h) To a person who has provided the agency with advance, adequate written assurance that the
 information will be used solely for statistical research or reporting purposes, but only if the information to be disclosed is in a form that will not identify any individual.

(i) Pursuant to a determination by the agency that maintains information that compelling circumstances exist that affect the health or safety of an individual, if upon the disclosure notification is transmitted to the individual to whom the information pertains at the individual’s last known address. Disclosure shall not be made if it is in conflict with other state or federal laws.

(j) To the State Archives as a record that has sufficient historical or other value to warrant its continued preservation by the California state government, or for evaluation by the Director of General Services or the
 director’s designee to determine whether the record has further administrative, legal, or fiscal value.

(k) To any person pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process if, before the disclosure, the agency reasonably attempts to notify the individual to whom the record pertains, and if the notification is not prohibited by law.

(l) To any person pursuant to a search warrant.

(m) Pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code.

(n) For the sole purpose of verifying and paying government health care service claims made pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code.

(o) To a law enforcement or regulatory agency when required for an investigation of unlawful activity or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes, unless the disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law.

(p) To another person or governmental organization to the extent necessary to obtain information from the person or governmental organization for an investigation by the agency of a failure to comply with a specific state law that the agency is responsible for enforcing.

(q) To an adopted person and disclosure is limited to general background information pertaining to the adopted person’s biological parents, if the information does not include or reveal the identity of the
 biological parents.

(r) To a child or a grandchild of an adopted person and disclosure is limited to medically necessary information pertaining to the adopted person’s biological parents. However, the information, or the process for obtaining the information, shall not include or reveal the identity of the biological parents. The State Department of Social Services shall adopt regulations governing the release of information pursuant to this subdivision. The regulations shall require licensed adoption agencies to provide the same services provided by the department as established by this subdivision.

(s) To a committee of the Legislature or to a Member of the Legislature, or the member’s staff if authorized in writing by the member, if the member has permission to obtain the
 information from the individual to whom it pertains or if the member provides reasonable assurance that the member is acting on behalf of the individual.

(t) (1) To the University of California, a nonprofit educational institution, an established nonprofit research institution performing health or social services research, the Cradle-to-Career Data System, for purposes consistent with the creation and execution of the Cradle-to-Career Data System Act pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, or, in the case of education-related data, another nonprofit entity, conducting scientific research, if the request for information is approved by the Committee for the Protection of Human Subjects (CPHS) for the California Health and Human
 Services Agency (CHHSA) or an institutional review board, as authorized in paragraphs (5) and (6). The approval shall include a review and determination that all the following criteria have been satisfied:

(A) The researcher has provided a plan sufficient to protect personal information from improper use and disclosures, including sufficient administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to protect personal information from reasonable anticipated threats
 to the security or confidentiality of the information.

(B) The researcher has provided a sufficient plan to destroy or return all personal information as soon as it is no longer needed for the research project, unless the researcher has demonstrated an ongoing need for the personal information for the research project and has provided a long-term plan sufficient to protect the confidentiality of that information.

(C) The researcher has provided sufficient written assurances that the personal information will not be reused or disclosed to any other person or entity, or used in any manner, not approved in the research protocol, except as required by law or for authorized oversight of the research project.

(2) The CPHS shall enter into a written agreement with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, as defined in Section 10862 of the Education Code, to assist the managing entity of that office in its role as the institutional review board for the Cradle-to-Career Data System.

(3) The CPHS or institutional review board shall, at a minimum, accomplish all of the following as part of its review and approval of the research project for the purpose of protecting personal information held in agency databases:

(A) Determine whether the requested personal information is needed to conduct the research.

(B) Permit access to personal information only if it is needed for the research project.

(C) Permit access only to the minimum necessary personal information needed for the research project.

(D) Require the assignment of unique subject codes that are not derived from personal information in lieu of social security numbers if the research can still be conducted without social security numbers.

(E) If feasible, and if cost, time, and technical expertise permit, require the agency to conduct a portion of the data processing for the researcher to minimize the release of personal information.

(4) Reasonable costs to the agency associated with the agency’s process of protecting personal information under the conditions of CPHS approval may be billed to the
 researcher, including, but not limited to, the agency’s costs for conducting a portion of the data processing for the researcher, removing personal information, encrypting or otherwise securing personal information, or assigning subject codes.

(5) The CPHS may enter into written agreements to enable other institutional review boards to provide the data security approvals required by this subdivision, if the data security requirements set forth in this subdivision are satisfied.

(6) Pursuant to paragraph (5), the CPHS shall enter into a written agreement with the institutional review board established pursuant to former Section 49079.6 of the Education Code. The agreement shall authorize, commencing July 1, 2010, or the date upon which the written agreement is executed, whichever
 is later, that board to provide the data security approvals required by this subdivision, if the data security requirements set forth in this subdivision and the act specified in subdivision (a) of Section 49079.5 of the Education Code are satisfied.

(u) To an insurer if authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 10900) of Division 4 of the Vehicle Code.

(v) Pursuant to Section 450, 452, 8009, or 18396 of the Financial Code.

(w) For the sole purpose of participation in interstate data sharing of prescription drug monitoring program information pursuant to the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code), if disclosure is limited to
 prescription drug monitoring program information.

This article does not require the disclosure of personal information to the individual to whom the information pertains if that information may otherwise be withheld as set forth in Section 1798.40.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 21.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.24a.

Notwithstanding Section 1798.24, information may be disclosed to any city, county, city and county, or district, or any officer or official thereof, if a written request is made to a local law enforcement agency and the information is needed to assist in the screening of a prospective concessionaire, and any affiliate or associate thereof, as these terms are defined in subdivision (k) of Section 432.7 of the Labor Code for purposes of consenting to, or approving of, the prospective concessionaire’s application for, or acquisition of, any beneficial
 interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest. However, any summary criminal history information that may be disclosed pursuant to this section shall be limited to information pertaining to criminal convictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1026, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.24b.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1798.24, except subdivision (v) thereof, information shall be disclosed to the protection and advocacy agency designated by the Governor in this state pursuant to federal law to protect and advocate for the rights of people with disabilities, as described in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Information that shall be disclosed pursuant to this section includes all of the following
 information:

(1) Name. 

(2) Address.

(3) Telephone number.

(4) Any other information necessary to identify that person whose consent is necessary for either of the following purposes:

(A) To enable the protection and advocacy agency to exercise its authority and investigate incidents of abuse or neglect of people with disabilities.

(B) To obtain access to records pursuant to Section 4903 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 878, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Accounting of Disclosures [1798.25. - 1798.29.]

1798.25.

(a) Each agency shall keep an accurate accounting of the date, nature, and purpose of each disclosure of a record made pursuant to subdivision (i), (k), (l), (o), or (p) of Section 1798.24. This accounting shall also be required for disclosures made pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 1798.24 unless notice of the type of disclosure has been provided pursuant to Sections 1798.9 and 1798.10. The
 accounting shall also include the name, title, and business address of the person or agency to whom the disclosure was made. For the purpose of an accounting of a disclosure made under subdivision (o) of Section 1798.24, it shall be sufficient for a law enforcement or regulatory agency to record the date of disclosure, the law enforcement or regulatory agency requesting the disclosure, and whether the purpose of the disclosure is for an investigation of unlawful activity under the jurisdiction of the requesting agency, or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes by that agency.

(b) Routine disclosures of information pertaining to crimes, offenders, and suspected offenders to law enforcement or regulatory agencies of federal, state, and local government shall be deemed to be disclosures pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1798.24 for the purpose of meeting this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 36.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.26.

With respect to the sale of information concerning the registration of any vehicle or the sale of information from the files of drivers’ licenses, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall, by regulation, establish administrative procedures under which any person making a request for information shall be required to identify himself or herself and state the reason for making the request. These procedures shall provide for the verification of the name and address of the person making a request for the information and the department may require the person to produce the information as it determines is necessary in order to ensure that the name and
 address of the person are his or her true name and address. These procedures may provide for a 10-day delay in the release of the requested information. These procedures shall also provide for notification to the person to whom the information primarily relates, as to what information was provided and to whom it was provided. The department shall, by regulation, establish a reasonable period of time for which a record of all the foregoing shall be maintained.

The procedures required by this subdivision do not apply to any governmental entity, any person who has applied for and has been issued a requester code by the department, or any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1213, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.27.

Each agency shall retain the accounting made pursuant to Section 1798.25 for at least three years after the disclosure for which the accounting is made, or until the record is destroyed, whichever is shorter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require retention of the original documents for a three-year period, providing that the agency can otherwise comply with the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.28.

Each agency, after July 1, 1978, shall inform any person or agency to whom a record containing personal information has been disclosed during the preceding three years of any correction of an error or notation of dispute made pursuant to Sections 1798.35 and 1798.36 if (1) an accounting of the disclosure is required by Section 1798.25 or 1798.26, and the accounting has not been destroyed pursuant to Section 1798.27, or (2) the information provides the name of the person or agency to whom the disclosure was made, or (3) the person who is the subject of the disclosed record provides
 the name of the person or agency to whom the information was disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.29.

(a) Any agency that owns or licenses computerized data that includes personal information shall disclose any breach of the security of the system following discovery or notification of the breach in the security of the data to any resident of California (1) whose unencrypted personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person, or, (2) whose encrypted personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person and the encryption key or security credential was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person and the agency that owns or licenses the encrypted information has a reasonable belief that the encryption key or security
 credential could render that personal information readable or usable. The
 disclosure shall be made in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement, as provided in subdivision (c), or any measures necessary to determine the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the data system.

(b) Any agency that maintains computerized data that includes personal information that the agency does not own shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of any breach of the security of the data immediately following discovery, if the personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person.

(c) The notification required by this section may be delayed if a law enforcement agency determines that the notification will impede
 a criminal investigation. The notification required by this section shall be made after the law enforcement agency determines that it will not compromise the investigation.

(d) Any agency that is required to issue a security breach notification pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The security breach notification shall be written in plain language, shall be titled “Notice of Data Breach,” and shall present the information described in paragraph (2) under the following headings: “What Happened,” “What Information Was Involved,” “What We Are Doing,” “What You Can Do,” and “For More Information.” Additional information may be provided as a supplement to the notice.

(A) The format of the
 notice shall be designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information it contains.

(B) The title and headings in the notice shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed.

(C) The text of the notice and any other notice provided pursuant to this section shall be no smaller than 10-point type.

(D) For a written notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i), use of the model security breach notification form prescribed below or use of the headings described in this paragraph with the information described in paragraph (2), written in plain language, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subdivision.[NAME OF INSTITUTION / LOGO] Date: [insert date]NOTICE OF DATA BREACH

What Happened?

 

What Information Was Involved?

What We Are Doing.

What You Can Do.

 Other Important Information.[insert other important information]

For More Information.

Call [telephone number] or go to [internet website]
(E) For an electronic notice described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), use of the headings described in this paragraph with the information described in paragraph (2), written in plain language, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subdivision.

(2) The security breach notification described in paragraph (1) shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) The name and contact information of the reporting agency subject to this section.

(B) A list of the types of personal information that were or are reasonably believed to have been the subject of a breach.

(C) If the information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided, then any of the following: (i) the date of the breach, (ii) the estimated date of the breach, or (iii) the date range within which the breach occurred. The notification shall also include the date of the notice.

(D) Whether the notification was delayed as a result of a law enforcement investigation, if that information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided.

(E) A general description of the breach incident, if that information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided.

(F) The toll-free telephone numbers and addresses of the major credit reporting agencies, if the breach exposed a social
 security number or a driver’s license or California identification card number.

(3) At the discretion of the agency, the security breach notification may also include any of the following:

(A) Information about what the agency has done to protect individuals whose information has been breached.

(B) Advice on steps that people whose information has been breached may take to protect themselves.

(e) Any agency that is required to issue a security breach notification pursuant to this section to more than 500 California residents as a result of a single breach of the security system shall electronically submit a single sample copy of that security breach notification,
 excluding any personally identifiable information, to the Attorney General. A single sample copy of a security breach notification shall not be deemed to be within Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “breach of the security of the system” means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal information maintained by the agency. Good faith acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of the agency for the purposes of the agency is not a breach of the security of
 the system, provided that the personal information is not used or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.

(g) For purposes of this section, “personal information” means either of the following:

(1) An individual’s first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the name or the data elements are not encrypted:

(A) Social security number.
